src/fst/phonology.twolc
!! # Nganasan twol file

!! This file documents the [phonology.twolc file](http://github.com/giellalt/lang-nio/blob/main/src/fst/phonology.twolc) 

Alphabet

! Letters of the alphabet
а б в г д е ё ж з и й к л м н ӈ о п р с т у ф х ц ч ш щ ъ ы ь э ю я
А Б В Г Д Е Ё Ж З И Й К Л М Н Ӈ О П Р С Т У Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ Ъ Ы Ь Э Ю Я

 ˮ ! Non-nasal glottal
 ʼ ! Nasal glottal

! other symbols
   %- !0



! Boundary symbols

 %>:0
 %-

Cx
Cy
X
Y

 ;



Sets
Vows =   о у ё ю О У Ё Ю ;
Ve =   ӓ а е и э я Ӓ А Е И Э Я ;
Vws =  Vo VO Ve ы Ы  ӹ Ӹ ; 

CnsNotGlots = б в г д ж з й к л м н п р с т ф х ц
              Б В Г Д Ж З Й К Л М Н П Р С Т Ф Х Ц
              ч ш щ
              Ч Ш Щ  ;
Glots = ˮ ʼ ;

Cns =  б в г д ж з к л м н ҥ п р с т ф х ц ч ш 
       Б В Г Д Ж З К Л М Н Ҥ П Р С Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш ;
Cst =  к п т ф х ц ч ш с 
       К П Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Ц ;

Ltrs = Vws Cns  ъ ь Ъ Ь ;

all =  Ltrs  %- ;




Definitions


Rules

"й:0 when followed by vowel in VowelPalatalization"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
й:0 <=> _ %>: [ а: | у: ] ;

"а:я VowelPalatalization"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
а:я <=> й: %>: _ ;

"у:ю VowelPalatalization"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
у:ю <=> й: %>: _ ;
